test/src/morphology/N-lookk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lookki contract stem lukija: # Noun - full paradigm
     lookki+N+Sg+Nom: lookki
     lookki+N+Sg+Gen: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Sg+Acc: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Sg+Ill: lookkja
     lookki+N+Sg+Loc: lookkjest
     lookki+N+Sg+Com: looǥǥin
     lookki+N+Ess: lookkjen
     lookki+N+Par: lookkjed
     lookki+N+Sg+Abe: looǥǥitää
     lookki+N+Pl+Nom: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Pl+Gen: looǥǥji
     lookki+N+Pl+Acc: looǥǥjid
     lookki+N+Pl+Ill: looǥǥjid
     lookki+N+Pl+Loc: looǥǥjin
     lookki+N+Pl+Com: looǥǥjivuiˊm
     lookki+N+Pl+Abe: looǥǥjitää
     
